Utah statutes.
11-36a-402.   Required provisions of impact fee enactment.

(1)  A local political subdivision or private entity shall ensure, in addition to the requirements described in Subsections (2) and (3), that an impact fee enactment contains:

(a)  a provision establishing one or more service areas within which the local political subdivision or private entity calculates and imposes impact fees for various land use categories;

(b) (i)  a schedule of impact fees for each type of development activity that specifies the amount of the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement; or

(ii)  the formula that the local political subdivision or private entity, as the case may be, will use to calculate each impact fee;

(c)  a provision authorizing the local political subdivision or private entity, as the case may be, to adjust the standard impact fee at the time the fee is charged to:

(i)  respond to:

(A)  unusual circumstances in specific cases; or

(B)  a request for a prompt and individualized impact fee review for the development activity of the state, a school district, or a charter school and an offset or credit for a public facility for which an impact fee has been or will be collected; and

(ii)  ensure that the impact fees are imposed fairly; and

(d)  a provision governing calculation of the amount of the impact fee to be imposed on a particular development that permits adjustment of the amount of the impact fee based upon studies and data submitted by the developer.

(2)  A local political subdivision or private entity shall ensure that an impact fee enactment allows a developer, including a school district or a charter school, to receive a credit against or proportionate reimbursement of an impact fee if the developer:

(a)  dedicates land for a system improvement;

(b)  builds and dedicates some or all of a system improvement; or

(c)  dedicates a public facility that the local political subdivision or private entity and the developer agree will reduce the need for a system improvement.

(3)  A local political subdivision or private entity shall include a provision in an impact fee enactment that requires a credit against impact fees for any dedication of land for, improvement to, or new construction of, any system improvements provided by the developer if the facilities:

(a)  are system improvements; or

(b) (i)  are dedicated to the public; and

(ii)  offset the need for an identified system improvement.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

